Connecticut, session 2026, SB00238.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (8) of section 19a-177 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(8) (A) Develop an emergency medical services data collection
system. Each emergency medical service organization licensed or
certified pursuant to this chapter shall submit data to the commissioner,
on a [quarterly] monthly basis, from each licensed ambulance service,
certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept service that provides
emergency medical services. Such submitted data shall include, but not
be limited to: (i) The total number of and reasons for calls for emergency
medical services received by such licensed ambulance service, certified
ambulance service or paramedic intercept service through the 9-1-1
system during the reporting period; (ii) each level of emergency medical
services, as defined in regulations adopted pursuant to section 19a-179,
required for each such call; (iii) the response time for each licensed
ambulance service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept
service during the reporting period; (iv) the number of passed calls,
cancelled calls and mutual aid calls, both made and received, during the
reporting period; and (v) for the reporting period, the prehospital data
for the nonscheduled transport of patients required by regulations
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 238
adopted pursuant to subdivision (6) of this section. The data required
under this subdivision may be submitted in any electronic form selected
by such licensed ambulance service, certified ambulance service or
paramedic intercept service and approved by the commissioner,
provided the commissioner shall take into consideration the needs of
such licensed ambulance service, certified ambulance service or
paramedic intercept service in approving such electronic form. The
commissioner may conduct an audit of any such licensed ambulance
service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept service as
the commissioner deems necessary in order to verify the accuracy of
such reported data.
(B) On or before June 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the
commissioner shall prepare a report to the Emergency Medical Services
Advisory Board, established pursuant to section 19a-178a, that shall
include, but not be limited to, the following data: (i) The total number
of calls for emergency medical services received during the reporting
year by each licensed ambulance service, certified ambulance service or
paramedic intercept service; (ii) the level of emergency medical services
required for each such call; (iii) the name of the emergency medical
service organization that provided each such level of emergency
medical services furnished during the reporting year; (iv) the response
time, by time ranges or fractile response times, for each licensed
ambulance service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept
service, using a common definition of response time, as provided in
regulations adopted pursuant to section 19a-179; (v) the number of
passed calls, cancelled calls and mutual aid calls during the reporting
year; and (vi) any shortage of emergency medical services personnel in
the state. The commissioner shall prepare such report in a format that
categorizes such data for each municipality in which the emergency
medical services were provided, with each such municipality grouped
according to urban, suburban and rural classifications.
(C) If any licensed ambulance service, certified ambulance service or
paramedic intercept service does not submit the data required under
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision for a period of six consecutive
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 238
months, or if the commissioner believes that such licensed ambulance
service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept service
knowingly or intentionally submitted incomplete or false data, the
commissioner shall issue a written order directing such licensed
ambulance service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept
service to comply with the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision and submit all missing data or such corrected data as the
commissioner may require. If such licensed ambulance service, certified
ambulance service or paramedic intercept service fails to fully comply
with such order not later than three months from the date such order is
issued, the commissioner (i) shall conduct a hearing, in accordance with
chapter 54, at which such licensed ambulance service, certified
ambulance service or paramedic intercept service shall be required to
show cause why the primary service area assignment of such licensed
ambulance service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept
service should not be revoked, and (ii) may take such disciplinary action
under section 19a-17 as the commissioner deems appropriate.
(D) The commissioner shall collect the data required by
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, in the manner provided in said
subparagraph, from each emergency medical service organization
licensed or certified pursuant to this chapter. Any such emergency
medical service organization that fails to comply with the provisions of
this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred
dollars per day for each failure to report the required data regarding
emergency medical services provided to a patient, as determined by the
commissioner. The civil penalties set forth in this subparagraph shall be
assessed only after the department provides a written notice of
deficiency and the organization is afforded the opportunity to respond
to such notice. An organization shall have not more than fifteen business
days after the date of receiving such notice to provide a written response
to the department. The commissioner may adopt regulations, in
accordance with chapter 54, concerning the development,
implementation, monitoring and collection of emergency medical
service system data. All state agencies licensed or certified as emergency
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 238
medical service organizations shall be exempt from the civil penalties
set forth in this subparagraph.
(E) The commissioner shall, with the recommendation of the
Connecticut Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board established
pursuant to section 19a-178a, adopt for use in trauma data collection the
most recent version of the National Trauma Data Bank's National
Trauma Data Standards and Data Dictionary and nationally recognized
guidelines for field triage of injured patients.
(F) On or before June 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the
commissioner shall submit the report described in subparagraph (B) of
this subdivision, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to
100 the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
101 cognizance of matters relating to public health.
102 (G) The commissioner shall establish and maintain an emergency
103 medical services response time dashboard. Such dashboard (i) shall be
104 capable of collecting and displaying emergency medical services
105 response time data to the public, disaggregated by geography, call type
106 and time of day, and (ii) shall not include any patient identifying
107 information. The Commissioners of Public Health, Social Services and
108 Emergency Services and Public Protection shall use data obtained from
109 the emergency medical services response time dashboard to support
110 any applications for federal emergency medical services response grants
111 and direct such grants to the communities in greatest need for improved
112 emergency medical services response times;
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 19a-177(8)
PH Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4